Louisiana, session 2026, HB409.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Section 2 of Act No. 481 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature
of Louisiana is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
* * *
Section 2. Any person whose cause of action related to sexual abuse of a
minor was barred by liberative prescription shall be permitted to file an action under
R.S. 9:2800.9 on or before June 14, 2027 2029. It is the express intent of the
legislature to revive until June 14, 2027 2029, any cause of action related to sexual
abuse of a minor that previously prescribed under any Louisiana prescriptive period.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1229 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 409